District of Columbia statutes.
45-602

Words importing singular number to include plural.

Words importing the singular number shall be held to include the plural, and vice versa, except where such construction would be unreasonable.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1189, ch. 854

Cross References

Acts and resolutions of Council, rules of construction, see § 1-301.45 et seq.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 49-202.
1973 Ed., § 49-202.